Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.070

Issuance of bonds—Terms.

The bonds issued for such hospital shall not have maturities in excess of twenty years. Such bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 26; 1984 c 26 s 5; 1983 c 167 s 72; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 49; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 26; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.070. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 5; RRS s 6090-5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.